New York, session 2025-2026, A132.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 404-ff to read as follows: 3 § 404-ff. Distinctive plates for fire police. 1. Any person who is a 4 member of the fire police or the spouse of any such person shall, upon 5 request, be issued a license plate bearing the words "Fire Police". If 6 a distinctive plate is issued to a person pursuant to this section, such 7 a distinctive plate shall not be issued to the spouse of such person. 8 Application for said license plate shall be filed with the commissioner 9 in such form and detail as the commissioner shall prescribe. 10 2. The distinctive plate authorized in subdivision one of this section 11 shall be issued upon proof, satisfactory to the commissioner, that the 12 applicant or the spouse of the applicant is a member of the fire police. 13 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 14 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 15 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this article 16 provided, however, that an additional one time service charge of ten 17 dollars shall be charged for such plate. 18 4. Nothing contained herein shall require the issuance of a special 19 number plate under this section unless the commissioner is satisfied 20 that the aggregate amount of annual service charges collected pursuant 21 to subdivision three of this section will be sufficient to recover the 22 costs of the design and manufacture of such special plates. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 24 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01141-01-5